Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2460.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 65A.01, subdivision 3c, is amended to read: Subd. 3c. Time requirements. (a) In the event of a policy less than 60 days old that is declined, or a policy that it is being canceled for nonpayment of premium, the notice must be mailed to the insured at least deleted text begin 20deleted text end new text begin 60new text end days before the effective cancellation date. If a policy is being declined or canceled for underwriting considerations, the insured must be informed of the source from which the information was received. (b) In the event of a midterm cancellation, for reasons listed in subdivision 3a, or according to policy provisions, notice must be mailed to the insured at least deleted text begin 30deleted text end new text begin 60new text end days before the effective cancellation date. (c) In the event of a nonrenewal, notice must be mailed to the insured at least 60 days before the effective date of nonrenewal, containing the specific underwriting or other reason for the indicated actions. (d) This subdivision does not apply to commercial policies regulated under sections 60A.36 and 60A.37.